Massachusetts, session 194th, S2418.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 7 of Chapter 90 is hereby amended by inserting:
All new automobiles sold in the Commonwealth after January 1, 2028, shall be equipped
with adaptive beam headlight technology, as authorized by the amendment to the Federal Motor
Vehicle Safety Standard No. 108 by the U.S. Department of Transportation’s National Highway
Traffic Safety Administration.
of 1